Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201279-955
Termination
of membership; accumulated contributions; return.

Upon
termination of employment for any cause other than death or retirement, the
retirement board shall, upon the member's demand, terminate his or her membership
in the retirement system and cause to be paid to such member the accumulated
contributions standing to the credit of his or her individual account in the
School Retirement Fund. Any member who attains or has attained membership
in another Nebraska state or school retirement system authorized by the Legislature
and who elects not to be or remain a member of the School Employees Retirement System of the State of
Nebraska shall have his or her accumulated contributions returned to him or
her forthwith.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 28, p. 647;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2928;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 461, p. 849;

Laws 1965, c. 532, § 1, p. 1676;

Laws 1967, c. 555, § 1, p. 1825;

Laws 1969, c. 735, § 7, p. 2780;

Laws 1976, LB 30, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 1170, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1527;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 590;

Laws 1997, LB 624, § 20;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 56;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 31.